Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.211, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Nursing home. "Nursing home" means a nursing home licensed under chapter 144Anew text begin and reimbursed under chapter 256Rnew text end , or a boarding care home licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.56new text begin and reimbursed under chapter 256Rnew text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.211, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Nursing home employer. "Nursing home employer" means an employer of nursing home workers in a deleted text begin licensed, Medicaid-certified facility that is reimbursed under chapter deleted text end deleted text begin 256Rdeleted text end new text begin nursing home as defined under subdivision 7new text end .